test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-aarran_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - aarrân: # 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    aarrân+N+Sg+Nom: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Gen: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Acc: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Ill: aṛânân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Loc: aṛânist
    aarrân+N+Sg+Com: aṛânáin
    aarrân+N+Sg+Abe: aarrânttáá
    aarrân+N+Ess: aṛânin
    aarrân+N+Par: aṛânid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Nom: aṛâneh
    aarrân+N+Pl+Gen: aṛânij
    aarrân+N+Pl+Acc: aṛânijd
    aarrân+N+Pl+Ill: aṛânáid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Loc: aṛânijn
    aarrân+N+Pl+Com: aṛânijguin
    aarrân+N+Pl+Abe: aṛânijttáá
